en: Incorrect product type
ar: نوع المنتج غير صحيح
bg: Неправилен тип продукт
ca: Tipus de producte incorrecte
cs: Nesprávný typ produktu
da: Forkert produkttype
de: Falscher Produkttyp
el: Εσφαλμένος τύπος προϊόντος
es: Tipo de producto incorrecto
et: Vale tootetüüp
fi: Väärä tuotetyyppi
fr: Type de produit incorrect
he: סอย מוצר שגוי
hi: अमान्य उत्पाद प्रकार
hr: Pogrešna vrsta proizvoda
hu: Hibás terméktípus
id: Tipe produk salah
it: Tipo di prodotto errato
ja: 不正な製品タイプ
ko: 잘못된 제품 유형
lt: Neteisingas produkto tipas
lv: Nepareizs produkta veids
ms: Jenis produk salah
nl: Verkeerd producttype
no: Feil produkttype
pl: Nieprawidłowy typ produktu
pt: Tipo de produto incorreto
ro: Tip de produs incorect
ru: Неправильный тип продукта
sk: Nesprávny typ produktu
sl: Napačna vrsta izdelka
sv: Fel produkttyp
th: ประเภทสินค้าไม่ถูกต้อง
tr: Yanlış ürün tipi
uk: Неправильний тип продукту
vi: Sai loại sản phẩm
zh: 错误的产品类型

en: Non beauty products
bg: Некозметични продукти
ca: Productes no de bellesa
de: Non-Beauty-Produkte, Non Beauty Produkte
es: Productos no de belleza
fi: ei kauneustuote
fr: Non beauté
hr: Neprehrambeni proizvodi za ljepotu
it: Prodotti non di bellezza
nl: Non-beauty
pt: Produtos não de beleza
ru: Непродукты для красоты, Не косметические продукты

en: Open Food Facts, OFF
xx: Open Food Facts, OFF

en: Open Pet Food Facts, OPFF
xx: Open Pet Food Facts, OPFF

en: Open Products Facts, OPF
xx: Open Products Facts, OPF

en: Hygiene
ar: نظافة
az: Gigiyena
bg: Хигиена
bn: স্বাস্থ্যবিধি
ca: Higiene
cs: Hygiena
da: Hygiejne
de: Hygiene
el: Υγιεινή
es: Higiene
et: Hügieen
fa: بهداشت
fi: Hygienia
fr: Hygiène
ga: Sláinteachas
he: היגיינה
hr: Higijena
hu: Higiénia
hy: Հիգիենա
id: Kebersihan
is: Hreinlæti
it: Igiene
ja: 衛生
ka: ჰიგიენა
kk: Гигиена
km: អនាម័យ
ko: 위생
ky: Гигиена
lt: Higiena
lv: Higiēna
mk: Хигиена
ms: Kebersihan
mt: Iġjene
nl: Hygiëne
no: Hygiene
pl: Higiena
pt: Higiene
ro: Igienă
ru: Гигиена
sk: Hygiena
sl: Higiena
sq: Higjiena
sr: Хигијена
sv: Hygien
sw: Usafi
tg: Гигиена
th: สุขอนามัย
tk: Arassaçylyk
tr: Hijyen
uk: Гігієна
ur: حفظان صحت
uz: Gigiyena
vi: Vệ sinh
zh: 卫生

en: Mouthwash, Mouthwashes
ar: غسول الفم
az: Ağız yaxalama
bg: Вода за уста
cs: Ústní vody
da: Mundskyl
de: Mundspülungen, Mundwasser
el: Στοματικό διάλυμα
es: Enjuagues bucales, enjuague bucal
et: Suuvesi
fa: دهانشویه
fi: Suuvesi
fr: Bains de bouche, bain de bouche
ga: Béaluisce
hr: Vodica za usta
hu: Szájvíz
hy: Բերանի ողողում
id: Obat kumur
is: Munnskol
it: Collutori
ja: マウスウォッシュ
ka: პირის ღრუს სავლები
kk: Ауызды шаюға арналған сұйықтық
ko: 구강 청결제
ky: Оозду чайкоочу каражат
lt: Burnos skalavimo skystis
lv: Mutes skalojamais līdzeklis
mk: Вода за уста
ms: Ubat kumur
mt: Ħasil tal-ħalq
nl: Mondwater
no: Munnskyll
pl: Płyny do płukania jamy ustnej
pt: Elixires bucais, elixir bucal
ro: Apă de gură
ru: Ополаскиватели для полости рта
sk: Ústne vody
sl: Ustna voda
sq: Shpëlarës goje
sr: Течност за испирање уста
sv: Mundvatten
sw: Maji ya kusukumia kinywa
tg: Маҳлули даҳон
th: น้ำยาบ้วนปาก
tk: Agyz çaýkamak
tr: Ağız gargarası
uk: Ополіскувачі для ротової порожнини
uz: Og'iz chayish
vi: Nước súc miệng
zh: 漱口水

en: Toothpastes, tooth pastes, tooth paste
ar: معجون الأسنان
az: Diş pastaları
bg: Пасти за зъби
cs: Zubní pasty
da: Tandpasta
de: Zahnpasten, Zahnpastas, Zahncremes
el: Οδοντόκρεμες
es: Pastas de dientes, pasta de dientes
et: Hambapastad
fa: خمیر دندان
fi: Hammastahnat
fr: Dentifrices
ga: Taos fiacla
hr: Paste za zube
hu: Fogkrémek
hy: Ատամի մածուկներ
id: Pasta gigi
is: Tannkrem
it: Dentifrici
ja: 歯磨き粉
ka: კბილის პასტები
kk: Тіс пасталары
ko: 치약
ky: Тиш пасталары
lt: Dantų pastos
lv: Zobu pastas
mk: Пасти за заби
ms: Ubat gigi
mt: Pasta tas-snien
nl: Tandanpastas, Tandanpasta
no: Tannkremer
pl: Pasty do zębów
pt: Cremes dentais, pasta de dentes
ro: Paste de dinți
ru: Зубные пасты
sk: Zubné pasty
sl: Zobne paste
sq: Pasta dhëmbësh
sr: Пасте за зубе
sv: Tandkräm
sw: Dawa ya meno
tg: Хамираи дандон
th: ยาสีฟัน
tk: Diş pastalary
tr: Diş macunları
uk: Зубні пасти
uz: Tish pastalari
vi: Kem đánh răng
zh: 牙膏

en: Children's toothpastes
ar: معجون أسنان للأطفال
az: Uşaq diş pastaları
bg: Детски пасти за зъби
cs: Zubní pasty pro děti
da: Børnetandpasta
de: Kinderzahnpasta
el: Παιδικές οδοντόκρεμες
es: Pasta de dientes para niños
et: Laste hambapasta
fa: خمیر دندان کودکان
fi: Lasten hammastahnat
fr: Dentifrices pour enfants
ga: Taos fiacla do pháistí
hr: Paste za zube za djecu
hu: Gyermekfogkrém
hy: Մանկական ատամի մածուկներ
id: Pasta gigi anak-anak
is: Barnatannkrem
it: Dentifrici per bambini
ja: 子供用歯磨き粉
ka: საბავშვო კბილის პასტები
kk: Балаларға арналған тіс пасталары
ko: 어린이 치약
ky: Балдар үчүн тиш пасталары
lt: Dantų pasta vaikams
lv: Zobu pastas bērniem
mk: Детски пасти за заби
ms: Ubat gigi kanak-kanak
mt: Pasta tas-snien tat-tfal
nl: Kindertandpasta
no: Barnetannkrem
pl: Pasty do zębów dla dzieci
pt: Cremes dentais para crianças
ro: Pastă de dinți pentru copii
ru: Зубные пасты для детей
sk: Zubné pasty pre deti
sl: Zobne paste za otroke
sq: Pastë dhëmbësh për fëmijë
sr: Пасте за зубе за децу
sv: Barntandkräm
sw: Dawa ya meno ya watoto
tg: Хамираи дандон барои кӯдакон
th: ยาสีฟันสำหรับเด็ก
tk: Çaga diş pastalary
tr: Çocuk diş macunları
uk: Зубні пасти для дітей
uz: Bolalar uchun tish pastalari
vi: Kem đánh răng trẻ em
zh: 儿童牙膏

en: Whitening toothpastes
ar: معجون أسنان مبيض
az: Ağardıcı diş pastaları
bg: Избелващи пасти за зъби
cs: Bělící zubní pasty
da: Tandpasta til hvidere tænder
de: Zahnweißpasten, Whitening-Zahnpasta
el: Λευκαντικές οδοντόκρεμες
es: Pastas de dientes blanqueadoras, Pasta de dientes blanqueadora
et: Valgendavad hambapastad
fa: خمیر دندان سفید کننده
fi: Valkaisevat hammastahnat
fr: Dentifrices blancheur, Dentifrice blancheur
ga: Taos fiacla bánaithe
hr: Paste za izbjeljivanje zubi
hu: Fogfehérítő fogkrémek
hy: Սպիտակեցնող ատամի մածուկներ
id: Pasta gigi pemutih
is: Tannkrem til að hvíta tennur
it: Dentifrici sbiancanti
ja: ホワイトニング歯磨き粉
ka: კბილების გასათეთრებელი პასტები
kk: Ағартатын тіс пасталары
ko: 미백 치약
ky: Агартуучу тиш пасталары
lt: Balinamosios dantų pastos
lv: Zobu pastas balināšanai
mk: Пасти за белење на заби
ms: Ubat gigi pemutih
mt: Pasta tas-snien li tibjad
nl: Bleektandpasta
no: Tannkremer for hvitere tenner
pl: Pasty wybielające do zębów
pt: Cremes dentais branqueadores, Pasta de dentes branqueadora
ro: Paste de dinți pentru albire
ru: Зубные пасты для отбеливания зубов
sk: Bieliace zubné pasty
sl: Zobne paste za beljenje
sq: Pastë dhëmbësh zbardhuese
sr: Пасте за избељивање зуба
sv: Tandkräm för vitare tänder
sw: Dawa ya meno ya kung'arisha
tg: Хамираи дандон барои сафедкунӣ
th: ยาสีฟันเพื่อฟันขาว
tk: Agardýjy diş pastalary
tr: Beyazlatıcı diş macunları
uk: Зубні пасти для відбілювання зубів
uz: Oqartiruvchi tish pastalari
vi: Kem đánh răng làm trắng răng
zh: 美白牙膏

en: Tartar control toothpastes
ar: معجون أسنان للسيطرة على الجير
az: Diş daşına nəzarət pastaları
bg: Пасти за зъби за контрол на зъбния камък
ca: Pasta de dents per al control del carrall
cs: Zubní pasty pro kontrolu zubního kamene
da: Tandpasta til kontrol af tandsten
de: Zahncremes zur Zahnsteinkontrolle
el: Οδοντόκρεμες ελέγχου της τρυγίας
es: Pastas de dientes para el control del sarro
et: Hambakivi kontrolli hambapastad
fa: خمیر دندان کنترل کننده جرم
fi: Hammaskiven hallintatahnata
fr: Dentifrices anti-tartre, Dentifrice anti-tartre
ga: Taos fiacla rialaithe tartar
hr: Paste za zube za kontrolu kamenca
hu: Fogkő elleni fogkrémek
hy: Ատամի քարի դեմ պայքարող ատամի մածուկներ
id: Pasta gigi pengontrol tartar
is: Tannkrem til að stjórna tannsteini
it: Dentifrici per il controllo del tartaro
ja: 歯石コントロール歯磨き粉
ka: კბილის ქვის კონტროლის კბილის პასტები
kk: Тіс тасын бақылауға арналған тіс пасталары
km: ថ្នាំដុសធ្មេញគ្រប់គ្រង Tartar
ko: 치석 조절 치약
ky: Тиш ташын көзөмөлдөөчү тиш пасталары
lv: Zobu pastas zobakmens kontrolei
mk: Пасти за заби за контрола на забен камен
ms: Ubat gigi kawalan tartar
mt: Toothpastes għall-kontroll tat-tartru
nl: Tandpasta's voor tandsteencontrole
no: Tannkremer for kontroll av tannstein
pl: Pasty do zębów kontrolujące kamień nazębny
pt: Pastas de dentes para controlo do tártaro
ro: Paste de dinți pentru controlul tartrului
ru: Зубные пасты для контроля зубного камня
sk: Zubné pasty na kontrolu zubného kameňa
sl: Zobne paste za nadzor zobnega kamna
sq: Pasta dhëmbësh për kontrollin e tartarit
sr: Пасте за зубе за контролу каменца
sv: Tandkräm för kontroll av tandsten
sw: Dawa za meno za kudhibiti tartar
tg: Хамираҳои дандон барои назорати санги дандон
th: ยาสีฟันควบคุมหินปูน
tk: Diş daşyny gözegçilik pastalary
tr: Tartar kontrolü diş macunları
uk: Зубні пасти для контролю зубного каменю
ur: ٹارٹر کنٹرول ٹوتھ پیسٹ
uz: Tish toshini nazorat qilish pastalari
vi: Kem đánh răng kiểm soát cao răng
zh: 牙垢控制牙膏

en: Sensitivity Toothpastes
ar: معجون أسنان للحساسية
az: Həssas dişlər üçün diş pastaları
bg: Пасти за чувствителни зъби
bn: সংবেদনশীল দাঁতের জন্য টুথপেস্ট
ca: Pasta de dents per a dents sensibles
cs: Zubní pasta pro citlivé zuby
da: Tandpasta til følsomme tænder
de: Zahnpasta für empfindliche Zähne
el: Οδοντόκρεμες για ευαίσθητα δόντια
es: Pasta de dientes para dientes sensibles
et: Tundlike hammaste hambapastad
fa: خمیر دندان برای دندان های حساس
fi: Hammastahna herkille hampaille
fr: Dentifrices dents sensibles
ga: Taos fiacla íogaireachta
hr: Paste za osjetljive zube
hu: Fogkrém érzékeny fogakra
hy: Զգայուն ատամների համար նախատեսված ատամի մածուկներ
id: Pasta gigi untuk gigi sensitif
is: Tannkrem fyrir viðkvæmar tennur
it: Dentifrici per denti sensibili
ja: 知覚過敏歯磨き粉
ka: პასტები მგრძნობიარე კბილებისთვის
kk: Сезімтал тістерге арналған тіс пасталары
km: ថ្នាំដុសធ្មេញសម្រាប់ធ្មេញដែលងាយប្រតិកម្ម
ko: 민감성 치약
ky: Сезимтал тиштер үчүн тиш пасталары
lt: Dantų pasta jautriems dantims
lv: Zobu pastas jutīgiem zobiem
mk: Пасти за чувствителни заби
ms: Ubat gigi untuk gigi sensitif
mt: Toothpastes għal snien sensittivi
nl: Tandpasta voor gevoelige tanden
no: Tannkrem for sensitive tenner
pl: Pasty do zębów wrażliwych
pt: Pastas de dentes para dentes sensíveis
ro: Paste de dinți pentru dinți sensibili
ru: Зубные пасты для чувствительных зубов
sk: Zubné pasty pre citlivé zuby
sl: Zobne paste za občutljive zobe
sq: Pasta dhëmbësh për dhëmbë të ndjeshëm
sr: Пасте за осетљиве зубе
sv: Tandkräm för känsliga tänder
sw: Dawa ya meno kwa meno nyeti
tg: Хамираи дандон барои дандонҳои ҳассос
th: ยาสีฟันสำหรับฟันที่บอบบาง
tk: Duýgur dişler üçin diş pastalary
tr: Hassas dişler için diş macunları
uk: Зубні пасти для чутливих зубів
ur: حساس دانتوں کے لیے ٹوتھ پیسٹ
uz: Sezgir tishlar uchun tish pastalari
vi: Kem đánh răng cho răng nhạy cảm
zh: 敏感牙膏

en: Soaps
ar: صابون
az: Sabunlar
bg: Сапуни
cs: Mýdla
da: Sæber
de: Seifen
el: Σαπούνια
es: Jabones
et: Seebid
fa: صابون
fi: Saippuat
fr: Savons
ga: Gallúnacha
hr: Sapuni
hu: Szappanok
hy: Օճառներ
id: Sabun
is: Sápur
it: Saponi
ja: 石鹸
ka: საპნები
kk: Сабындар
ko: 비누
ky: Самын
lt: Muilai
lv: Ziepes
mk: Сапуни
ms: Sabun
mt: Sapun
nl: Zepen
no: Såper
pl: Mydła
pt: Sabonetes
ro: Săpunuri
ru: Мыло
sk: Mydlá
sl: Mila
sq: Sapunët
sr: Сапуни
sv: Tvålar
sw: Sabuni
tg: Собунҳо
th: สบู่
tk: Saby
tr: Sabunlar
uk: Мило
uz: Sovunlar
vi: Xà phòng
zh: 肥皂

en: Scented soaps
de: Duftseifen, Duftseife
es: Jabones perfumados, Jabón perfumado
fr: Savons parfumés, Savon parfumé
it: Saponi profumati, Sapone profumato
nl: Geparfumeerde zepen, Geparfumeerde zeep
pt: Sabonetes perfumados, Sabonete perfumado

en: Unscented soaps
de: Unparfümierte Seifen, Unparfümierte Seife
es: Jabones sin perfume, Jabón sin perfume
fr: Savons non parfumés, Savon non parfumé, Savons sans parfum
it: Saponi non profumati, Sapone senza profumo
nl: Ongeparfumeerde zepen, Ongeparfumeerde zeep
pt: Sabonetes sem perfume, Sabonete sem perfume

en: Marseille soaps, Marseille soap
de: Marseiller Seife, Savon de Marseille
es: Jabón de Marsella, Jabones de Marsella
fr: Savons de Marseille, Savon de Marseille
it: Sapone di Marsiglia
nl: Marseillezeep
pt: Sabonete de Marselha

en: Dermatological soaps, Dermatological soap
ar: الصابون الجلدي
az: Dermatoloji sabunlar, dermatoloji sabun
bg: Дерматологични сапуни, дерматологичен сапун
cs: Dermatologická mýdla, dermatologické mýdlo
da: Dermatologiske sæber, dermatologisk sæbe
de: Dermatologische Seifen, dermatologische Seife
el: Δερματολογικά σαπούνια, δερματολογικό σαπούνι
es: Jabones dermatológicos, jabón dermatológico
et: Dermatoloogilised seebid, dermatoloogiline seep
fa: صابون پوست
fi: Ihotautisaippuat, ihotautisaippua
fr: Savons dermatologiques, savon dermatologiques, savons dermatologique
ga: Gallúnacha deirmeolaíochta, gallún deirmeolaíochta
hr: Dermatološki sapuni, dermatološki sapun
hu: Bőrgyógyászati szappanok, bőrgyógyászati szappan
hy: Մաշկաբանական օճառներ, մաշկաբանական օճառ
id: Sabun dermatologis
is: Húðfræðilegar sápurnar, húðfræðileg sápa
it: Saponi dermatologici, sapone dermatologico
ja: 皮膚科学石鹸
ka: დერმატოლოგიური საპნები, დერმატოლოგიური საპონი
kk: Дерматологиялық сабындар, дерматологиялық сабын
ko: 피부 과학 비누
ky: Дерматологиялык самындар, дерматологиялык самын
lt: Dermatologiniai muilai, dermatologinis muilas
lv: Dermatoloģiskās ziepes, dermatoloģiskā ziepes
mk: Дерматолошки сапуни, дерматолошки сапун
ms: Sabun dermatologi
mt: Sapun dermatoloġiku
nl: Dermatologische zepen, dermatologische zeep
no: Dermatologiske såper, dermatologisk såpe
pl: Mydła dermatologiczne, mydło dermatologiczne
pt: Sabonetes dermatológicos, sabonete dermatológico
ro: Săpunuri dermatologice, săpun dermatologic
ru: Дерматологическое мыло
sk: Dermatologické mydlá, dermatologické mydlo
sl: Dermatološka mila, dermatološko milo
sq: Sapunë dermatologjikë, sapun dermatologjik
sr: Dermatološki sapuni, dermatološki sapun
sv: Dermatologiska tvålar, dermatologisk tvål
sw: Sabuni za ngozi
tg: Собунҳои дерматологӣ, собуни дерматологӣ
th: สบู่ dermatological
tk: Dermatologik sabynlar, dermatologik sabyn
tr: Dermatolojik sabunlar, dermatolojik sabun
uk: Дерматологічне мило
uz: Dermatologik sovunlar, dermatologik sovun
vi: Xà phòng da liễu
zh: 皮肤科香皂

en: Liquid soaps
ar: صابون سائل
az: Maye sabunlar
bg: Течни сапуни
cs: Tekutá mýdla
da: Flydende sæber
de: Flüssigseifen
el: Υγρά σαπούνια
es: Jabones líquidos
et: Vedelseebid
fa: صابون مایع
fi: Nestesaippuat
fr: Savons liquides, Savon liquide
ga: Gallúnacha leachtacha
hr: Tekući sapuni
hu: Folyékony szappanok
hy: Հեղուկ օճառներ
id: Sabun cair
is: Fljótandi sápur
it: Saponi liquidi
ja: 液体石鹸
ka: თხევადი საპნები
kk: Сұйық сабындар
ko: 액체 비누
ky: Суюк самындар
lt: Skysti muilai
lv: Šķidrās ziepes
mk: Течни сапуни
ms: Sabun cecair
mt: Sapun likwidu
nl: Vloeibare zepen, vloeibare zeep
no: Flytende såper
pl: Mydła w płynie
pt: Sabonetes líquidos
ro: Săpunuri lichide
ru: Жидкое мыло
sk: Tekuté mydlá
sl: Tekoča mila
sq: Sapunë të lëngshëm
sr: Течни сапуни
sv: Flytande tvål
sw: Sabuni za maji
tg: Соуни моеъ
th: สบู่เหลว
tk: Suwuk sabynlar
tr: Sıvı sabunlar
uk: Рідке мило
uz: Suyuq sovunlar
vi: Xà phòng lỏng
zh: 液体皂

en: Bar soaps
de: Seifenstücke, Feste Seifen
es: Jabones en pastilla, Pastillas de jabón, Jabón en barra
fr: Savons solides, Savon solide, Pains de savon, Pain de savon
it: Saponette, Sapone solido
nl: Stukken zeep, Vaste zeep
pt: Sabonetes em barra, Sabonete em barra

en: Scented bar soaps
de: Parfümierte Seifenstücke, Parfümierte feste Seife
es: Pastillas de jabón perfumadas, Jabón en barra perfumado
fr: Savons solides parfumés, Savon solide parfumé
it: Saponette profumate, Sapone solido profumato
nl: Geparfumeerde stukken zeep, Geparfumeerde vaste zeep
pt: Sabonetes em barra perfumados, Sabonete em barra perfumado